New York, session 2025-2026, A1904.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The vehicle and traffic law is amended by adding a new 2 section 125-b to read as follows: 3 § 125-b. Qualified hybrid vehicle. A qualified hybrid vehicle is a 4 motor vehicle as defined in section one hundred twenty-five of this 5 article, other than an electric vehicle, that draws propulsion energy 6 from both an internal combustion engine (or heat engine that uses 7 combustive fuel) and an energy storage device, and employs a regenera- 8 tive vehicle braking system that recovers waste energy to charge such 9 energy storage device. 10 § 2. Subparagraphs (e) and (f) of paragraph b of subdivision 1 of 11 section 401 of the vehicle and traffic law, as amended by chapter 222 of 12 the laws of 1996, are amended to read as follows: 13 (e) provided, that, if such motor vehicle is an altered livery, the 14 applicant shall so furnish a certified copy of the length of the center 15 panel of such vehicle, provided, however, that the commissioner shall 16 require such proof, as [he] such commissioner may determine is neces- 17 sary, in the application for registration and provided further, if the 18 center panel of such vehicle exceeds one hundred inches, the commission- 19 er shall require proof that such vehicle is in compliance with all 20 applicable federal and state motor vehicle safety standards; [and] (f) 21 provided, that, if such motor vehicle is a "qualified hybrid vehicle" as 22 defined in section one hundred twenty-five-b of this chapter, the appli- EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05500-01-5 A. 1904 2 1 cant shall furnish proof to the commissioner, in the application for 2 registration, or otherwise, of the make, model and model year of such 3 applicant's motor vehicle. If such proof has been submitted, such appli- 4 cant's certificate of registration shall contain a distinguishing mark 5 which shall designate such applicant's motor vehicle as a "qualified 6 hybrid vehicle," and shall also display such motor vehicle's United 7 States environmental protection agency highway fuel economy rating of 8 forty-five miles per gallon or more. The commissioner is hereby author- 9 ized to promulgate any rules and regulations necessary for the implemen- 10 tation of the provisions of this subparagraph; and (g) such additional 11 facts or evidence as the commissioner may require in connection with the 12 application for registration. 13 § 3. Paragraph a of subdivision 3 of section 401 of the vehicle and 14 traffic law, as amended by section 1 of part H of chapter 59 of the laws 15 of 2009, is amended to read as follows: 16 a. Upon filing of such application and the payment of the fee herein- 17 after provided, the commissioner shall assign to such motor vehicle a 18 distinctive number and, without expense to the applicant, issue and 19 deliver in such manner as the commissioner may select to the owner a 20 certificate of registration, in such form as the commissioner shall 21 prescribe[,]. Such certificate of registration shall contain a distin- 22 guishing mark which shall designate such motor vehicle as a "qualified 23 hybrid vehicle" as defined in section one hundred twenty-five-b of this 24 chapter, pursuant to subparagraph (f) of paragraph b of subdivision one 25 of this section, and shall contain adequate space upon which such motor 26 vehicle's United States environmental protection agency highway fuel 27 economy rating of forty-five miles per gallon or more shall be 28 displayed. The commissioner shall also issue and deliver two number 29 plates at a place within the state of New York named by the applicant in 30 [his or her] the applicant's application. A number plate, within the 31 meaning of this chapter, may, in the discretion of the commissioner, be 32 a plate of a permanent nature, treated with reflectorized material 33 according to specifications prescribed by the commissioner, and with a 34 date tag attached to such plate or to the vehicle as prescribed by regu- 35 lations of the commissioner indicating the validity of the plate during 36 a certain period and the issuance of such a number plate with such date 37 tag to a person possessing such a number plate shall be deemed the issu- 38 ance of a number plate. An additional fee, not to exceed twenty-five 39 dollars, shall be paid to the commissioner whenever a set of reflector- 40 ized number plates is issued for any vehicle for which a registration 41 fee is normally charged except that, with respect to any number plate 42 which is specifically requested by the applicant, such fee shall be paid 43 to the commissioner upon approval of such request. In the event of the 44 loss, mutilation or destruction of any certificate of registration, any 45 number plate or set of number plates whether with or without a date tag 46 or tags, or any date tag or set of date tags provided for in this arti- 47 cle, the owner of a registered motor vehicle may file such statement and 48 proof of the facts as the commissioner shall require, with a fee of 49 three dollars, in the office of the commissioner, or, unless and until 50 the commissioner shall otherwise direct, in the office of the agent who 51 issued the certificate, plate, plates, tag or tags and the commissioner 52 or [his or her] the commissioner's agent, as the case may be, shall 53 issue a duplicate or substitute. It shall be the duty of every owner 54 holding a certificate of registration to notify the commissioner in 55 writing of any change of residence of such person within ten days after A. 1904 3 1 such change occurs, and to inscribe on such certificate, in the place 2 provided by the commissioner, a record of such change of residence. 3 § 4. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 4 it shall have become a law.